Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-544
School board members; contract to teach prohibited.

No member of a school board shall be engaged in a contract to teach pursuant to sections 79-817
to 79-821 with the school district which he or she serves as a
board member.

Laws 1881, c. 78, subdivision III, § 10, p. 345;

Laws 1883, c. 72, § 5, p. 291;

R.S.1913, § 6761;

C.S.1922, § 6302;

C.S.1929, § 79-310;

R.S.1943, § 79-310;

Laws 1949, c. 256, § 105, p. 727;

Laws 1971, LB 214, § 1;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-466;

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 297;

Laws 1999, LB 272, § 75;

Laws 2001, LB 242, § 24;

Laws 2009, LB163, § 1.